Massachusetts, session 194th, S440.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 66, the following new section:
Section 67. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Department”, the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
“Extraordinary Inflation”, inflation in past fiscal years that exceeded the 4.5% cap on the
inflation adjustment to the Foundation budget pursuant to subsection (a) of section 3 of chapter
70 of the general laws.
''Fund'', the School Budget Stabilization Fund, established under subsection (b) of section
67 of chapter 15 of the general laws.
of 3

(b) There is hereby established on the books of the commonwealth a separate fund to be
known as the School Budget Stabilization Fund.
(c) The fund shall be credited with:
(i) revenue from appropriations and other money authorized by the general court and
specifically designated to be credited to the fund;
ii) interest earned on money in the fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject
to further appropriation and any money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not
revert to the General Fund.
(d) Amounts in the fund shall be held by the Department, exclusively for the purposes of
the fund, and the agency shall disburse amounts in the fund, without further appropriation, upon
the request from time to time of its commissioner.
(e) The Department shall make expenditures from the fund for the purpose of providing
financial relief for school districts in response to Chapter 70 funding limits caused by
extraordinary inflation in past fiscal years.
(f) The Department shall establish guidelines for the equitable disbursement of funds.
g) Not later than September 1 of each year, the commissioner of the Department shall file
a report in writing with the joint committee on education and the house and senate committees on
ways and means concerning the grants made in the fiscal year ending on the preceding June 30.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of “Foundation inflation index” and inserting in place thereof:
of 3

“Foundation Inflation Index,” the ratio of the value of the implicit price deflator for state
and local government purchases in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year to its value in the third
quarter of the fiscal year 2 years prior. Should the index exceed 1.045, the department shall act
pursuant to Section 18 of this chapter.
SECTION 3. Chapter 70 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 17, the following new section:
Section 18. If the Foundation Inflation Index, as so defined in section 2 of this chapter,
exceeds 1.045, the department shall submit to the board a plan for restoring the full amount of
funding to districts should the department deem the index too high to restore funding in the same
fiscal year. The plan shall be no longer than five fiscal years in length, shall include the full
amount of funding lost to inflation that fiscal year, and shall consider any projected losses in
future fiscal years as a result of previous shortfalls in Chapter 70 allocations. The plan, upon
approval by the board, shall be submitted to the house and senate chairs of the joint committee
on education, the chair of the House committee on ways and means, the chair of the Senate
committee on ways and means, and the Secretary of Administration and Finance. The
department shall also make the report publicly available on its website.
of 3